Maryland, session 2026, HB1131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
20–215. RESERVED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1131*

HOUSE BILL 1131
20–216. RESERVED.
PART V. PREGNANCY LOSS.
20–217.
(A) IN THIS PART THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “INVESTIGATING ENTITY” INCLUDES:
(1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY;
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES;
(3) THE SOCIAL SERVICES ADMINISTRATION WITHIN THE
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES OR A LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL
SERVICES; OR
(4) CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF
HUMAN SERVICES OR A LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES.
(C) (1) “PREGNANCY LOSS” MEANS THE UNINTENTIONAL OR
INTENTIONAL DEATH OF A FETUS OR EMBRYO DURING PREGNANCY OR LABOR.
(2) “PREGNANCY LOSS” INCLUDES A MISCARRIAGE, A STILLBIRTH,
AND A SELF–MANAGED ABORTION.
(3) “PREGNANCY LOSS” DOES NOT INCLUDE A DEATH THAT OCCURS
AFTER A LIVE BIRTH.
(D) “PROVIDER” MEANS:
(1) A PERSON WHO IS LICENSED, CERTIFIED, OR OTHERWISE
AUTHORIZED UNDER THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE TO PROVIDE HEALTH
CARE IN THE ORDINARY COURSE OF BUSINESS OR PRACTICE OF A PROFESSION;
(2) A FACILITY WHERE HEALTH CARE IS PROVIDED TO PATIENTS OR
RECIPIENTS, INCLUDING:
(I) A FACILITY AS DEFINED IN § 10–101(G) OF THIS ARTICLE;

HOUSE BILL 1131 3
(II) A HOSPITAL AS DEFINED IN § 19–301 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(III) A RELATED INSTITUTION AS DEFINED IN § 19–301 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(IV) A FACILITY AT WHICH SERVICES COVERED BY A HEALTH
MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION, AS DEFINED IN § 19–701(G) OF THIS ARTICLE, ARE
PROVIDED;
(V) AN OUTPATIENT CLINIC;
(VI) A MEDICAL LABORATORY;
(VII) A COMPREHENSIVE CRISIS RESPONSE CENTER;
(VIII) A CRISIS STABILIZATION CENTER; AND
(IX) A CRISIS TREATMENT CENTER ESTABLISHED UNDER §
7.5–207 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
(3) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDES DOULA SERVICES AS DEFINED
UNDER § 15–141.4 OF THIS ARTICLE.
20–218.
(A) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO EXPERIENCED A PREGNANCY LOSS MAY NOT BE
SUBJECT TO INVESTIGATION, CIVIL LIABILITY, OR CRIMINAL PROSECUTION FOR
EXPERIENCING A PREGNANCY LOSS UNLESS:
(1) THERE IS INDEPENDENT EVIDENCE OF CRIMINAL CONDUCT
UNRELATED TO THE PREGNANCY OR PREGNANCY LOSS; OR
(2) AN INVESTIGATING ENTITY OBTAINS THE CONSENT OF THE
INDIVIDUAL THAT EXPERIENCED THE PREGNANCY LOSS TO INVESTIGATE
SUSPECTED CRIMINAL CONDUCT OF ANOTHER PERSON RELATED TO THE
PREGNANCY OR PREGNANCY LOSS.
(B) IF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO EXPERIENCED PREGNANCY LOSS IS SUBJECT TO
AN INVESTIGATION IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE
INDIVIDUAL MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST THE INVESTIGATING ENTITY.

HOUSE BILL 1131
(C) AN INCIDENCE OF A PREGNANCY LOSS DOES NOT CONSTITUTE
PROBABLE CAUSE TO ISSUE A SEARCH WARRANT UNDER § 1–203 OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE UNLESS:
(1) THERE IS INDEPENDENT EVIDENCE OF CRIMINAL CONDUCT
UNRELATED TO THE PREGNANCY OR PREGNANCY LOSS; OR
(2) THE PERSON SEEKING THE SEARCH WARRANT OBTAINS THE
CONSENT OF THE INDIVIDUAL THAT EXPERIENCED A PREGNANCY LOSS TO
INVESTIGATE THE SUSPECTED CRIMINAL CONDUCT OF ANOTHER PERSON RELATED
TO THE PREGNANCY OR PREGNANCY LOSS.
20–219.
(A) SUBJECT TO GENERALLY ACCEPTED MEDICAL STANDARDS, A PROVIDER
ACTING WITHIN THE PROVIDER’S SCOPE OF PRACTICE MAY NOT BE SUBJECT TO
INVESTIGATION, CRIMINAL PENALTY, OR CIVIL LIABILITY FOR SUPPORTING A
PATIENT WHO IS EXPERIENCING A PREGNANCY LOSS OR AFTER A PREGNANCY LOSS.
(B) A PROVIDER MAY NOT REPORT A PREGNANCY LOSS OR DISCLOSE ANY
PORTION OF A MEDICAL RECORD, AS DEFINED UNDER § 4–301 OF THIS ARTICLE,
RELATED TO A PREGNANCY LOSS UNLESS:
(1) THERE IS CLEAR EVIDENCE OF EXTERNAL ABUSE OR COERCION
RELATED TO THE PREGNANCY LOSS;
(2) THERE IS INDEPENDENT EVIDENCE OF CRIMINAL CONDUCT
UNRELATED TO THE PREGNANCY LOSS; OR
(3) THE PROVIDER FIRST OBTAINS THE CONSENT OF THE INDIVIDUAL
THAT EXPERIENCED THE PREGNANCY LOSS.
20–220.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A
PROVIDER, AN INVESTIGATING ENTITY, OR ANY OTHER PERSON WHO KNOWINGLY
AND WILLFULLY VIOLATES § 20–218 OR § 20–219 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING:
(1) $1,000 FOR THE FIRST OFFENSE; AND
(2) $5,000 FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE.

HOUSE BILL 1131 5
(B) A PROVIDER, AN INVESTIGATING ENTITY, OR ANY OTHER PERSON WHO
KNOWINGLY, WILLFULLY, AND UNDER FALSE PRETENSES OR THROUGH DECEPTION
VIOLATES § 20–218 OR § 20–219 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING PENALTIES:
(1) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $50,000 OR
IMPRISONMENT FOR NOT MORE THAN 1 YEAR OR BOTH; AND
(2) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $100,000 OR IMPRISONMENT FOR NOT MORE THAN 5 YEARS OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.